Massachusetts, session 194th, H587.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Purpose
The purpose of this legislation is to ensure that all staff members responsible for teaching
or supervising extracurricular activities in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts are adequately
trained to identify and address microaggressions and implicit bias. This bill aims to create
inclusive and respectful environments for students engaged in extracurricular activities.
Section 2. Definitions
For purposes of this Act:
Extracurricular Activities shall refer to any educational programs or activities offered
outside the regular school curriculum, including but not limited to sports, music, clubs,
performing arts, student leadership programs, and other enrichment activities.
of 3

Staff Members shall refer to any individual employed or contracted by public or private
educational institutions in Massachusetts who oversees or assists in extracurricular activities.
Microaggressions shall refer to subtle, often unintentional, actions or comments that may
be perceived as offensive or disrespectful based on a person's race, ethnicity, gender, sexual
orientation, or other identity characteristics.
Implicit Bias shall refer to unconscious attitudes or stereotypes that affect an individual’s
actions, decisions, and perceptions in ways that may not be aligned with their conscious beliefs
or values.
Section 3. Training Requirement
(a) Mandatory Training:
All staff members involved in teaching or supervising extracurricular activities in public
or private educational institutions in Massachusetts shall complete training in the areas of
microaggressions and implicit bias. This training shall be completed as part of the staff
member’s onboarding process and must be refreshed annually.
(b) Training Program:
The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education (DESE) shall develop the
required training program. This program shall include, but not be limited to:
An overview of microaggressions and implicit bias.
The impact of microaggressions and implicit bias on student experience and well-being.
of 3

Practical strategies to address and mitigate microaggressions and implicit bias in
interactions with students.
Techniques for creating inclusive and supportive environments for students in
extracurricular activities.
Section 4. Certification and Record Keeping
(a) Certification:
Upon successful completion of the required training, each staff member shall receive a
certificate of completion, issued by the DESE.
(b) Record Keeping:
Educational institutions shall maintain records of training completion for each staff
member and must retain these records for a minimum of three years.
Section 5. Implementation and Oversight
(a) Department of Elementary and Secondary Education (DESE):
The DESE shall oversee the implementation of the training requirements and develop
guidelines for educational institutions to follow. DESE will also ensure that training materials are
accessible to all staff and available in both in-person and online formats.
(b) Compliance and Enforcement:
Institutions that fail to comply with the training requirements set forth in this Act may be
subject to penalties, including the withholding of state funding, as determined by the DESE.
of 3